Louisiana, session 2026, HB445.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:4071(A), (B)(introductory paragraph), (E), (F), (H)(1), (2), (5),
(6), (7), and (10), and (J) and 4072 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4071. Louisiana Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Advisory
Council; creation; membership; powers, duties, and functions
A. The Louisiana Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics
Advisory Council (LaSTEM) is hereby created under the auspices of the Board of
Regents Louisiana Works to coordinate and oversee the creation, delivery, and
promotion of STEM education programs, to increase student interest and
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 445 ENROLLED
achievement in the fields of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics, to
ensure the alignment of education, economic development, industry, and workforce
needs, and to increase the number of women who graduate from a postsecondary
institution with a STEM degree or credential.
B. The council shall consist of twenty-nine members as follows the
following members:
* * *
E. The council shall be chaired by the commissioner of higher education
secretary of Louisiana Works or his designee. The secretary of Louisiana Economic
Development or his designee shall serve as the initial vice chairman of the council.
Thereafter, the vice chairmanship shall alternate on a triennial basis between the state
superintendent of education, or his designee, the secretary of Louisiana Economic
Development or his designee, and the secretary of Louisiana Works or his designee.
The council may elect such other officers as it deems necessary.
F. The council shall meet monthly twice each year and at such other times
as called by the chairman. Beginning August 31, 2018, the council shall be required
to meet only quarterly. The commissioner of higher education shall convene the first
meeting of the council not later than September 15, 2017. Members of the council
may attend and participate in a meeting via electronic means in accordance with R.S.
42:17.2.
* * *
H. As funding allows, the council shall:
(1) Create a comprehensive, statewide STEM plan that contains clear
objectives to guide guides the development of STEM education and aligned to
STEM career opportunities and aligns elementary, secondary, and postsecondary
STEM curricula, programs, initiatives, and activities.
(2) Coordinate all state STEM education-related programs and activities to
align to workforce needs.
* * *
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 445 ENROLLED
(5) Encourage industry and business entities to provide funding, resources,
and technical assistance to elementary, secondary, and postsecondary schools to
promote interest in STEM discipline courses and career opportunities.
(6) Connect STEM education resources, initiatives, and programs regionally
and throughout the state.
(7) Establish an information clearinghouse, to be housed at the Board of
Regents Louisiana Works, to identify and provide best practice resources for both
the secondary and postsecondary educational systems and to review and acquire
STEM education-related instructional materials education and training.
* * *
(10) Establish a competitive grants program to fund robotics competitions
to provide students at all appropriate grade levels opportunities to improve science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics skills by participating in events sponsored
by a science and technology development program known as FIRST (For Inspiration
and Recognition of Science and Technology) Robotics. The program may be funded
through the Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Education Fund
and any other available public or private funds.
* * *
J. The council, through the Board of Regents Louisiana Works, shall submit
a status report regarding all actions taken to implement the provisions of this Section,
including metrics that measure the success of implementing council activities and
initiatives and any recommendations for legislation or policy changes, to the Senate
Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Labor and Industrial Relations,
and the House Committee on Education, and the House Committee on Labor and
Industrial Relations by January thirtieth of each year.
§4072. Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Education Fund
A. The Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM)
Education Fund, referred to in this Section as the "fund", is hereby created in the
state treasury as a special fund for the purpose of conducting student-focused,
project-based, programs and competitions in STEM subjects, including robotics,
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 445 ENROLLED
coding, and design-build test projects, in grades prekindergarten through college
level.
B.(1) The source of monies deposited into the fund shall be legislative
appropriations. Monies in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the
legislature and shall be available exclusively for programs and initiatives prescribed
by the Louisiana Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Advisory
Council.
(2) The treasurer is hereby authorized to establish a separate account within
the fund for the deposit of grants and donations received by the Louisiana Science,
Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Advisory Council. If the terms and
conditions of the grant or donation or the agreements pertaining thereto require that
the monies not be deposited into the treasury, the grant or donation may nevertheless
be deposited into the fund. Monies in this separate account shall not be subject to
legislative appropriation but shall be used by the council only to further their
mission. After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the fund any monies transferred or appropriated by the legislature.
The treasurer shall also deposit into the fund any grants, donations, gifts, or other
monies which may become available.
C. All unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end of the
fiscal year shall remain in the fund. Such monies shall be invested by the state
treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and interest earned
on the investment of these monies shall be credited to the fund, after compliance
with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana,
relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund.
D. The council shall adopt a resolution stating which members or officers are
authorized to withdraw money from the fund and the separate account in the fund,
which resolution shall be submitted to the state treasury. Monies in the fund and the
separate account shall only be used by the council to further their mission.
Section 2. R.S. 36:309(E)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 445 ENROLLED
§309. Transfer of agencies to Louisiana Works
* * *
E. The following agencies are transferred to and hereafter shall be within
Louisiana Works and shall perform and exercise their powers, duties, functions, and
responsibilities as provided by law:
* * *
(3) Louisiana Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Advisory
Council (R.S. 17:4071).
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 17:4071(B)(11), (15), (23), and (24) and R.S. 36:651(K)(6) are
hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.